Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4096.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 166.270 is amended to read:
166.270. (1)(a) [Any] A person who has been convicted of a felony under the law of this state
or any other state, or who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the Government of the
United States, who owns or has in the person’s possession or under the person’s custody or control
any firearm commits the crime of felon in possession of a firearm.
(b) A person commits the crime of aggravated felon in possession of a firearm if the
person:
(A) Has been convicted of a felony under the law of this state or any other state, or who
has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the Government of the United States, and
owns or has in the person’s possession or under the person’s custody or control three or
more firearms; or
(B) Commits the crime of felon in possession of a firearm described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection and, at the time of the offense, has one or more prior convictions under this
subsection.
(2) [Any] A person who has been convicted of a felony under the law of this state or any other
state, or who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the Government of the United States,
who owns or has in the person’s possession or under the person’s custody or control any instrument
or weapon having a blade that projects or swings into position by force of a spring or by centrifugal
force or any blackjack, slungshot, sandclub, sandbag, sap glove, metal knuckles or an Electro-
Muscular Disruption Technology device as defined in ORS 165.540, or who carries a dirk, dagger
or stiletto, commits the crime of felon in possession of a restricted weapon.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a person “has been convicted of a felony” if, at the time
of conviction for an offense, that offense was a felony under the law of the jurisdiction in which it
was committed. Such conviction shall not be deemed a conviction of a felony if:
(a) The court declared the conviction to be a misdemeanor at the time of judgment; or
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 261

HB 4096
(b) The offense was possession of marijuana and the conviction was prior to January 1, 1972.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person who has been:
(a) Convicted of only one felony under the law of this state or any other state, or who has been
convicted of only one felony under the laws of the United States, which felony did not involve
criminal homicide, as defined in ORS 163.005, or the possession or use of a firearm or a weapon
having a blade that projects or swings into position by force of a spring or by centrifugal force, and
who has been discharged from imprisonment, parole or probation for said offense for a period of 15
years prior to the date of alleged violation of subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Granted relief from the disability under 18 U.S.C. 925(c) or ORS 166.274 or has had the
person’s record expunged under the laws of this state or equivalent laws of another jurisdiction.
(5)(a) Felon in possession of a firearm is a Class C felony.
(b) Aggravated felon in possession of a firearm is a Class B felony.
(c) Felon in possession of a restricted weapon is a Class A misdemeanor.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission shall classify aggravated felon in possession of a firearm as crime category 7
of the sentencing guidelines grid of the commission.
(b) The commission shall classify aggravated felon in possession of a firearm as crime
category 8 if the person:
(A) Owns or has in the person’s possession, or under the person’s custody or control, six
or more firearms; or
(B) At the time of the offense, has three or more prior convictions under subsection (1)
of this section.

[2]